Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4839
Sale or purchase of parts prohibited;
penalty.

(a)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a person that
for valuable consideration, knowingly purchases or sells a part for transplantation,
therapy, research, or education if removal of a part from an individual is
intended to occur after the individual's death commits a Class IIIA felony.

(b)
A person may charge a reasonable amount for the removal, processing, preservation,
quality control, storage, transportation, implantation, or disposal of a part.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 16.